Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1100.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-53 of the General Laws entitled "Low and Moderate Income
Housing" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-53-17. Well testing for private or public wells in the town of Tiverton.
(a) For any private or public well requirement within the town of Tiverton, the town may
require additional testing to be performed by the developer, to ensure that any well within close
proximity of the construction site will not be affected by dewatering or the loss of effective
recharge. This condition shall be satisfied prior to the commencement of construction on any low-
or moderate- income housing under this chapter.
(b) The testing shall comply with all regulations issued by the department of environmental
management and the department of health.
(c) The department of environmental management may issue rules and regulations to
promulgate the requirements of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002920
========